West Virginia, session 2026, HB4838.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 10. FEES FOR REGISTRATION, LICENSING, ETC. §17A-10-3c.  Additional registration fees for alternative fuel vehicles. (a) The annual registration fee for a vehicle fueled with hydrogen or natural gas is $200 $400.(b) The annual registration fee for a vehicle operating on a combination of electricity and petrochemical fuels is $100 $200.(c) The annual registration fee for a vehicle operating exclusively on electricity is $200 $400.(d) The fees imposed by this section are in addition to any other fee set forth in this article.